Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-350
State hospitals for the mentally ill; legal settlement of patient in another county; treatment.

When the chief executive officer of a state hospital for the mentally ill has been notified, as provided for in sections 83-313 to 83-357, that a patient sent to the hospital from one county has a legal settlement in another county of the state, the chief executive officer shall thereafter hold and treat such patient as from the latter county.

G.S.1873, c. 31, § 25, p. 417;

R.S.1913, § 7252;

C.S.1922, § 6909;

C.S.1929, § 83-714;

R.S.1943, § 83-350;

Laws 1947, c. 335, § 38, p. 1072;

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 23, p. 3058;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 137.

County of legal settlement means the county in which a person had a residence at the time of becoming incompetent. County of Kearney v. County of Buffalo, 167 Neb. 117, 91 N.W.2d 304 (1958).